North Carolina, session 2025, HB1076.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. INCREASE NORTH CAROLINA INNOVATIONS WAIVER SLOTS
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits (DHB), shall amend the North Carolina Innovations waiver to increase the number of
waiver slots available under the waiver by 6,635 slots. These additional slots shall be made
available on July 1, 2026, or as soon as practicable after that date.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), the sum of two hundred forty
million dollars ($240,000,000) in recurring funds and associated receipts beginning with the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to fund these additional slots.
SECTION 1.(c) This section is effective July 1, 2026.

PART II. REVISE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS AND REDUCE FUNDS FOR THE
OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-562.1(3a) reads as rewritten:
"(3a) Eligible student. – A student residing in North Carolina who has not yet
received a high school diploma and who meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Is eligible to attend a North Carolina public school pursuant to Article
25 of this Chapter. A child who is the age of 4 on or before April 16 is
eligible to attend the following school year if the principal, or
equivalent, of the school in which the child seeks to enroll finds that
the student meets the requirements established by the Authority
pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.2(d) and those findings are submitted to the
Authority.
b. Has not been enrolled in a postsecondary institution as a full-time
student taking at least 12 hours of academic credit.
c. Has not been placed in a nonpublic school or facility by a public
agency at public expense.
*H1076-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. Resides in a household with an income level not in excess of two
hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the student to
qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-562.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.2. Scholarship grants.
(a) The Authority shall make available no later than February 1 annually applications to
eligible students for the award of scholarship grants to attend any nonpublic school on a full- or
part-time basis. Information about scholarship grants and the application process shall be made
available on the Authority's website. Beginning March 15, the Authority shall begin awarding
scholarship grants to students who have applied by March 1 in the following order:
(1) Eligible students who received a scholarship grant for the school year prior to
the school year for which the students are applying.
(2) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (1) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(3) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (2) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(4) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (3) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(5) All other students.
…
(b2) Scholarship grants shall be awarded to eligible students as follows:
(1) For students residing in households with an income level not in excess of the
amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price
lunch program, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to one hundred
percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year.
(2) For students residing in households with an income level between the amount
required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch
program and not in excess of two hundred percent (200%) of that amount, per
year per eligible student, an amount of up to ninety percent (90%) of the
average State per pupil allocation for average daily membership in the prior
fiscal year.
(3) For students residing in households with an income level of between two
hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the student to qualify for
the federal free or reduced-price lunch program and not in excess of four
hundred fifty percent (450%) of that amount, per year per eligible student, an
amount of up to sixty percent (60%) of the average State per pupil allocation
for average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(4) For all students, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to forty-five
percent (45%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, unless the student qualifies for a higher
amount under this subsection.
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-562.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.8. The Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve.
…
(b) The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical need in this State to provide
opportunity for school choice for North Carolina students, it is imperative that the State provide
an increase of funds for 15 years to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve. Therefore,
there There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve the following amounts for each
fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section:
Page 2 House Bill 1076-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Fiscal Year Appropriation
…
2027-2028 $700,000,000$460,000,000
2028-2029 $725,000,000$485,000,000
2029-2030 $750,000,000$510,000,000
2030-2031 $775,000,000$535,000,000
2031-2032 $800,000,000$560,000,000
For the 2032-2033 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Reserve the sum of eight hundred twenty-five million dollars ($825,000,000)
five hundred eighty-five million dollars ($585,000,000) to be used for the purposes set forth in
this section. When developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for each fiscal year
specified in this subsection, the Director of the Budget shall include the appropriated amount
specified in this subsection for that fiscal year.
…."
SECTION 2.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
recurring funds appropriated in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant
Fund Reserve for the award of opportunity scholarship grants pursuant to Part 2A of Article 39
of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes in the 2027-2028 fiscal year shall be reduced by the sum
of two hundred forty million dollars ($240,000,000) in recurring funds.
SECTION 2.(e) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to
applications for the award of scholarship funds beginning in the 2027-2028 school year.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 1076-First Edition Page 3